Florida, session 2026, HB817.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 790.402, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
790.402 Reporting of lost or stolen firearms.—
(1) An individual who owns or lawfully possesses a firearm
must report the loss or theft of the firearm to the local law
enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the loss or
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb817-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 817 2026
theft occurred within 48 hours after the time that he or she
knew or reasonably should have known that the firearm had been
lost or stolen and provide to the local law enforcement agency
the make, model, caliber, and serial number, if known, of the
firearm and the date, time, place, and circumstances surrounding
the last time the individual saw the firearm.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, upon receiving a report
of a lost or stolen firearm, the local law enforcement agency
shall create an incident report and, upon request of the
reporting individual, provide a copy of the report to the
individual at no cost.
(3) An individual who has reported a firearm lost or
stolen under subsection (1) and who subsequently recovers the
firearm shall notify the local law enforcement agency to which
the loss or theft was reported within 48 hours after the
recovery.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb817-00